District of Columbia statutes.
32-1610.01

Youth activities.

(a)

The WIC shall develop policies and procedures for the selection of providers of youth employment and training services consistent with the requirements of section 123 of the Federal Act.

(b)

The policies and procedures required by subsection (a) of this section shall ensure that the providers of youth employment and training activities are selected on a competitive basis.

July 18, 2000, D.C. Law 13-150, § 11a
as added May 2, 2015, D.C. Law 20-263, § 2(k), 62 DCR 1518